Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201955-183
National Guard; state-sponsored life insurance program; Adjutant General; powers and duties.

(1) For purposes of this section, state-sponsored life insurance program means the life insurance program exclusively offered to all members of the Nebraska National Guard through the National Guard Association of Nebraska pursuant to the federal Veterans' Insurance Act of 1974, Public Law 93-289.

(2) Pursuant to this section, the Adjutant General shall:

(a) Allow efforts to make the state-sponsored life insurance program available to all members of the Nebraska National Guard;

(b) Provide an opportunity for members of the Nebraska National Guard to purchase state-sponsored life insurance program products; and

(c) Allow state-sponsored life insurance program representatives to provide Nebraska National Guard members with state-sponsored life insurance program briefings during annual training and inactive duty training periods to educate members on the state-sponsored life insurance program.

Laws 2019, LB223, § 1.
September 1, 2019